dev/segmenter/apertium-kaz.kaz-seg.twol
"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A} after й and и"
%{A%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
        where Vy  in ( е  е  е  е  е  я  я  я  я  я  я  я  я )
        LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ұ  ю  у )
               matched ;

"Vowel harmony for archiphoneme {E} after й" ! should be just like {A}
%{E%}:Vy <=> [ :LastVowel й: ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
        where Vy  in ( е  е  е  е  е  я  я  я  я  я  я  я  я )
        LastVowel in ( и  ү  е  э  ө  я  а  ё  о  ы  ұ  ю  у )
              matched ;

"Deletion of й before yoticised vowels when not earlier in a stem"
й:0 <=> _ %>: [ :YotVow ]/[ :0 ] ;

!"Delete й before yoticised vowels"
!й:0 <=> _ ( %>: ) YotVow ;

!"A Vowel harmony after й"
!%{A%}:я <=> [ :BackVow :Cns* й:0 ]/[ %>: ] _ ;


!!!! Consonant-vowel interactions !!!!

!!! FIXME:  суға still surfacing as суге
"Back assimilation of G"
! %{G%}:ғ <=> :BackVow [ :Cns* [ :Cns - [ :VoicelessCns | :FrontCns ] ]* ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
! %{G%}:ғ <=> _ [ :BackVow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
%{G%}:ғ <=> [ [ :BackVow | ы:0 ] :Cns* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{☭%}:0 ] ] | :и | :у ] _ ;
                            [ .#. :Cns* [ :у | :ю ]* :Cns* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{☭%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
                            [ :BackCns (:Vow) [ :и | :у | :ю ]* :Cns* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - [ Abstract: | %{☭%}:0 ] ] ] _ ;
                                             [ %{а%}: AbstrVoicedCns:* ]/[ %>: | :%- ] _ ;
                                            [ %{ә%}:ә Cns:* ]/[ %>: | :0 - [ Abstract:0 ] ]  _ ;
              [ %{ъ%}: :Cns* ]/[ [ %>: | :0 - [ Abstract: | %{☭%}:0 ] ] | :и | :у | :ю ] _ ;
           FrontCns: BackVow: [ %>: | %{☭%}:0 ]* _ ;
            except
    :VoicelessCns/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
        :FrontCns/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
            %{I%}: :Nasals %>: _ %{A%}: (%>:) .#. ;  ! avoid conflict with "Deletion of dative {G} after px1sg, px2sg"
             %{I%}: :Nasals %>: _ %{A%}: (%>:) %  ;  ! ""
!    [ :BackVow [ :и | :у ]/:Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{☭%}:0 ] ] _ ;

!!!"Assimilation of G to
!!!%{G%}:ғ <=> [ ы:0 :у :Cns* ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
!!!
!!!%{G%}:ғ <=> [ ы:0 :у :Cns* ]/[ %>: ] _ ;

"Back assimilation of K"
%{K%}:қ <=> [ :BackVow | ы:0 | %{а%}: ] [ :Cns* [ :Cns - [ :VoicelessCns | :FrontCns ] ]* ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - ы:0 ] ] _ ;
            [ :BackVow | ы:0 | %{а%}: ] [ :Cns* %{с%}: ]/[ %>: ] _ ;
!            except
!    [ :BackVow [ :и | :у ]/:Cns* ]/[ :0 - [ Abstract:0 | %{☭%}:0 ] ] _ ;
        except
            _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 - [ ы: | %{а%}: ] ] ;


"Back assimilation and voicing of K"
%{K%}:ғ <=> [ :BackVow | ы:0 ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - ы: ] ] _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 - [ ы: | %{а%}: ] ] ;

"Voicing of K"
%{K%}:г <=> [ :FrontVow ]/[ %>: | [ :0 - ы: ] ] _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 - [ ы: | %{а%}: ] ]  ;


!!!! Disappearing stuff !!!!

"Deletion of {A} directly after vowel"
%{A%}:0 <=> [ :Vow - [ :и | :у ] ] %>: _ ;

"Deletion of ы before у"
ы:0 <=> _ :у/[ %>: | :0 ] ;

"Deletion of і before у"
і:0 <=> _ :у/[ %>: | :0 ] ;

"у > ю after stems in /й/"
у:ю <=> [ :и | й: ] ( [ %{ъ%}: | %{❗%}: ] ) %>: _ ;

"Deletion of {S} after a consonant"
!%{S%}:0 <=> [ :Cns | й: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] _ ;
%{S%}:0 <=> :CnsRight/[ [ :0 - AbstrCns: ] | %>: ] _ ;
            AbstrCns:/[ %>: | %-: ] _ ;

"Deletion of {I} after vowels"
%{I%}:0 <=> [ :VowRight ]/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
            except
                               %{o%}:0 _ ;
            [ %{э%}:0 [ :Cns | AbstrCns: ]* ]/[ %>: | %-: | %{S%}: ] _ ;

! "Dialectal deletion of л between low vowel and Iп"   ! Dir/LR
! л:0 <=> :LowVow _ %>: %{I%}: :п ;                    ! Dir/LR
!
! "Dialectal deletion of I when л deletes before Iп"   ! Dir/LR
! %{I%}:0 <=> л:0 %>: _ :п ;                           ! Dir/LR

"Dialectal deletion of л between low vowel and Iп"
!л:0 <=> :LowVow _ %>: %{o%}:0 ;
л:0 <=> .#. (:Cns) :Vow _ %>: %{o%}:0 ;

"Dialectal deletion of I when л deletes before Iп"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{o%}:0 _ ;

"Epenthesis in some stems"
%{y%}:0 <=> _ [ :Cns :Vow ]/[ :0 | %>: ] ;

!!!!  Possessive + case stuff !!!!

"Deletion of accusative {N} after {n}"
%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;
            %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: %  ;
            %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: %- ;

"Deletion of {n} before genitive {N}s"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{N%}: %{I%}: \[ .#. | %  | %- ]  ;

!"Deletion of ablative-initial {D} after {n}"
!%{D%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{A%}: :н ;

"Deletion of {n} before ablative {D}"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{D%}: %{A%}: :н ;

"Deletion of {n} before instrumental {M}"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{M%}: :е :н ;

"Deletion of dative {G} after px1sg, px2sg"
%{G%}:0 <=>  %{I%}: :Nasals %>: _ %{A%}: (%>:) .#. ;
             %{I%}: :Nasals %>: _ %{A%}: (%>:) %  ;

"/n/ deletion in px3 nominative"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;
            _ %  ;  ! before a space
            _ %- ;  ! before a dash

"Deletion of {I} after {n}"
%{I%}:0 <=> %{n%}:н/[ :0 | %>: ] _ ;
            except
                         %{o%}:0 _ ;

"Deletion of т when usually Russian word ending in ст precedes suffix starting in т"
т:0 <=> :с/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ %{L%}: | %{N%}: | %{D%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
!
! журналист:журналист
! журналист>LAр:журналистер
! журналист>NI:журналисті
!
! should also apply optionally to all suffixed forms (e.g. журналист>GA:журналиске is attested, but not as common as :журналистке)

"Deletion of д when usually Russian word ending in зд precedes suffix starting in д"
д:0 <=> :з/[ %>: | :0 ] _ [ %{L%}: | %{N%}: | %{D%}: | %{G%}: ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
!
! съезд:съезд
! съезд>LAр:съездер
! съезд>NI:съезді
! съезд>GA:съезге

"Deletion of numeral final - in nominative"
%-:0 <=> [ %0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9 ] _  .#. ;

"Deletion of ь when vowel-initial stem follows"
ь:0 <=> _ %>: [ :Vow ]/[ %>: | :0 ] ;

"Deletion of с at end of сс stem with suffix"
с:0 <=> :с _ :0* %>: ;

"{д} surfaces before vowels"
! ал%{д%}+{D}{A}н     ал%{д%}+{I}
! ал-дан               алд-ы
%{д%}:д <=> _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
            _ .#. ;

"{т} surfaces before vowels"
%{т%}:т <=> _ :Vow/[ %>: | :0 ] ;
! ас%{т%}+{D}{A}н     ал%{д%}+{I}
! ас-тан              аст-ы

"Deletion of {і} at end of word (i.e., in stand-alone forms)"
%{і%}:0 <=> _ .#. ;
